Washington statutes.
RCW 36.93.140

Pending actions not affected.

Actions described in RCW 36.93.090 which are pending July 1, 1967, or actions in counties with populations of less than two hundred ten thousand which are pending on the date of the creation of a boundary review board therein, shall not be affected by the provisions of this chapter. Actions shall be deemed pending on and after the filing of sufficient petitions initiating the same with the appropriate public officer, or the performance of an official act initiating the same.

[ 1991 c 363 s 97; 1967 c 189 s 14.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.